Wisconsin, session 2025, AB463.
do enact as follows:AB463,11Section 1. 343.10 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB463,3,42343.10 (5) (a) 3. The occupational license of the applicant shall restrict the 3applicant’s operation under the occupational license to vehicles that are equipped 4with a functioning ignition interlock device if the department has revoked the 5person’s operating privilege under s. 343.31 (1m) (b) or the court has ordered under 6s. 343.301 (1g) that the person’s operating privilege for Class D vehicles be 7restricted to operating vehicles that are equipped with an ignition interlock device 8or has ordered under s. 346.65 (6) (a) 1., 1999 stats., that the motor vehicle owned by 9the person and used in the violation or improper refusal be equipped with an 10ignition interlock device. A person to whom a restriction under this subdivision 11applies violates that restriction if he or she removes or disconnects an ignition 12interlock device, requests or permits another to blow into an ignition interlock 13device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock device for the 14purpose of providing the person an operable motor vehicle without the necessity of 15first submitting a sample of his or her breath to analysis by the ignition interlock 16device, or otherwise tampers with or circumvents the operation of the ignition 17interlock device. Except as provided in s. 343.301 (3) (b), if the occupational license 18restricts the applicant’s operation to a vehicle that is equipped with an ignition 19interlock device, the applicant shall be liable for the reasonable costs of equipping 1the vehicle with the ignition interlock device. This subdivision does not apply to an 2applicant who is subject to an order under s. 343.301 (1g) (am) 2. while the 3applicant is participating in a program designated in the order, unless he or she is 4also subject to an order under s. 343.301 (1g) (am) 1.AB463,25Section 2. 343.30 (1q) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB463,3,136343.30 (1q) (b) 4. Except as provided in sub. (1r) or subd. 4m., if the number of 7convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total 8number of other convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under s. 343.307 9(1), equals 3 or more, the court shall revoke the person’s operating privilege for not 10less than 2 years nor more than 3 years. After Except as provided in s. 343.31 (1m) 11(b), after the first 45 days of the revocation period has have elapsed, the person is 12eligible for an occupational license under s. 343.10 if he or she has completed the 13assessment and is complying with the driver safety plan ordered under par. (c).AB463,314Section 3. 343.31 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB463,4,415343.31 (1m) (b) Upon receiving a record of conviction under s. 940.09 (1) or 16940.25 or conviction, suspension, or revocation counted under s. 343.307 (1) that 17together with other records of the department show that the number of convictions 18under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total number of 19other convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under s. 343.307 (1), equals 204 or more, the department shall revoke the person’s operating privilege 21permanently. This paragraph does not apply if the most recent conviction, 22suspension, or revocation counted under this paragraph occurred more than 15 23years after the next preceding conviction, suspension, or revocation counted under 24this paragraph. The After the first 180 days of the revocation period have elapsed, 1the person is not eligible for an occupational license under s. 343.10 if he or she has 2completed the assessment and is complying with the driver safety plan ordered 3under s. 343.30 (1q) (c). After 10 years of the revocation period have elapsed, the 4person may apply for reinstatement under s. 343.38.AB463,4,55